Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2849
Board; membership; qualifications.

The board shall be composed of eight members, including five actively practicing pharmacists, at least one of whom practices within the confines of a hospital, one pharmacy technician, and two public members who are interested in the health of the people of Nebraska.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 945;

Laws 2025, LB332, § 33.